California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
Each year, at the time of making the special assessment tax levy, the city council shall appropriate from the fund designated in the resolution ordering the improvement or from any other available fund a sum sufficient to pay that portion of the total cost of the improvement which is to be paid by the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 23.)
-------------------------------------------

18167.

The city council may also transfer from the general fund of the city to the fund of the district sufficient money to pay all or any part of the percentage of the yearly cost of the improvement which is to be paid from funds raised from the district. The amount of money so transferred shall be deemed a loan to the district fund and shall be repaid to the general fund from the first money thereafter coming into the district fund from taxes levied upon lands within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 23.)
-------------------------------------------

18168.

The special assessment tax shall be levied, computed, entered, collected and enforced at the same time, in the same manner, by the same persons and with the same penalties as other taxes for city purposes and when collected shall be paid into the city treasury to the credit of the fund of the district and shall, subject to the provisions of Sections 18092 and 18092.1, which shall be applicable to the procedure provided by this chapter, be used only for the payment of the expenses of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 23.)
-------------------------------------------

18169.

If for any reason there is a deficiency in the funds derived from the assessment for any improvement, including all incidental expenses thereof, the city council may meet such deficiency by an appropriation out of the general fund of the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 23.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Bids and Awards of Contract [18170. - 18170.]

18170.

At any time after the transmission of the diagram and assessment to the city tax collector or city auditor, the city council may let the contract for making such improvement. If the proceeding was commenced before the street lighting system referred to in the resolution of intention was installed or ordered installed, then such contract shall not be awarded until the street lighting system is installed or is duly ordered installed by the city council. If the installation of such proposed lighting system is abandoned, then the proceedings under this part shall be abandoned.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Miscellaneous Provisions [18190. - 18193.]

18190.

The money collected by the tax collector shall be paid by him, as fast as collected, to the city treasurer, who shall place it in a special fund designated by the name of the improvement proceeding, and payment shall be made out of said special fund only for the purposes provided for in this part. To expedite the making of any such improvement, the city council may at any time transfer into said special fund, out of any money in the general fund, such sums as it may deem necessary, and the sums so transferred shall be deemed a loan to such special fund, and shall be repaid out of the proceeds of the assessments provided for in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18191.

The city council may adopt a resolution declaring its intention to abandon an assessment district or any portion thereof, describing the area to be abandoned and appointing a time and place for hearing as provided in Section 18070. Such resolution may be adopted at any time prior to the awarding of any contract for making the improvement but no such resolution which would otherwise be effective after the award of such contract and prior to its date of termination as contemplated in Section 18171.1 shall be adopted without the prior receipt by the city council of the written consent of the contractor. Notice of the adoption of the resolution shall be posted and published, protests may be filed, and the hearing shall be held as provided in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 18070) of this division. If there is a protest to such abandonment made by the owners of more than one-half the area of the land subject to assessment in such area to be abandoned, the city council shall forthwith cease such abandonment proceedings unless that body, by a four-fifths affirmative vote of all its members finds that the public interest and convenience require such abandonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1440.)
-------------------------------------------

18192.

The city council may reinstitute any such abandoned assessment district or abandoned portion of such assessment district as a separate district, either concurrently with or following proceedings for abandonment in the same manner as provided in this division for the establishment of the district initially. In the event that the abandonment and reinstatement proceedings are concurrent, the resolution of intention to abandon shall recite such fact.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1440.)
-------------------------------------------

18193.

Upon such entire or partial abandonment, all money collected for any improvements which have not been made, which money has not been paid therefor, shall be repaid to the owners of the parcels in the abandoned portion as shown on the last equalized assessment roll preceding the date of partial abandonment; provided, however, that if a district is reinstated concurrently with a partial abandonment, such money shall not be repaid but shall be credited against the cost of the improvements of the reinstated district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1440.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. THE STREET LIGHTING ACT OF 1931 [18300. - 18440.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [18300. - 18313.]

18300.

This part may be cited as the Street Lighting Act of 1931.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18301.

This part shall be liberally construed in order to effectuate its purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18302.

This part provides an alternative system for making the improvements authorized by this part, and the provisions of this part shall not apply to or affect any other provisions of this code. When any proceedings are commenced under this part, the provisions of this part and no others shall apply to all such proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18303.

Unless the particular provision or the context otherwise requires, the definitions and general provisions contained in this chapter shall govern the construction of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18304.

“Street lighting system” or “system” includes any or all appliances, poles, posts, electroliers, transformers, lighting units, lamps, cables, wires, pipes, conduits, and other suitable or necessary works or appliances for street lighting purposes. Any such street lighting system may include all or any portion of a city.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1101.)
-------------------------------------------

18305.

“Service,” and any of its variants, means the electrical current or energy or other illuminating agent used to light a street lighting system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18306.

“Maintenance” means the repair, replacement, inspection, cleaning or painting of the posts and standards and the equipment attached to or used in connection with such posts and standards, and includes such incidental expenses incurred in connection therewith as may be necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18307.

“Improvement,” and any of its variants, includes the maintenance or servicing, or both, of all or part of any one or more street lighting systems.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18308.

“Contract year” means a period of 12 months.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18309.

“Installment assessment” means the amount levied by the city council for the first or any subsequent contract year to create a fund with which to pay for the improvement for the next contract year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18310.

“Clerk” or “city clerk” means any person or officer who is or acts as clerk of the city council.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18311.

“Street” includes alleys and other public places.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18312.

“City” includes all corporations organized and existing for municipal purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18313.

“City council” includes any body which by law is the legislative department of the government of the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Authority to Maintain and Service [18320. - 18325.]

18320.

Whenever in the opinion of the city council the public interest or convenience may require, that body may:

(a) Order any street lighting system to be maintained in or along the whole or any part of any one or more of the streets in such city.

(b) Order electric current or energy, gas, or other illuminating agent to be furnished for such street lighting system.

(c) Determine and declare the lands to be benefited by any such improvement. 

(d) Assess, either partly or wholly, the costs and expenses (including all incidental expenses) of such improvement, or of any one or more of the items thereof, upon the lands benefited.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18321.

The improvement shall be for a period to commence at a time to be fixed by the city council but not exceeding five years from the date of commencement thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18322.

The provisions of this part shall not be limited to the improvement of street lighting systems owned only by the city, but the city council may also order such improvement to be made upon street lighting systems provided and installed by, and remaining the property of, any public utility, public corporation, or other person with whom a contract is entered into for such improvement and may assess the costs and expenses thereof in accordance with this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18323.

If there is more than one street lighting system in any city any or all of such systems may be consolidated and improved under one proceeding. In such case the consolidated system shall be zoned so that those systems of approximately the same general type are grouped together.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18324.

Whenever a street lighting system is installed along a boundary line or street of any city, the city council may, by resolution, assess the land abutting upon such boundary line or street for the estimated cost and expense of improving the system, even though the system is partially or entirely without the boundaries of the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18325.

If land has been assessed pursuant to Section 18324, the city council may proceed in all respects in connection therewith as though the street lighting system were entirely within the city limits; except that the city council may enter into a contract with the legislative body of the city or county having jurisdiction over the adjoining territory either to improve all or any portion of the street lighting system, or to have all or any portion of the system improved by the legislative body of the adjoining territory. The legislative body contracting to furnish such improvement may enter into any contract or issue any purchase order authorized in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Report and Resolution of Intention [18340. - 18343.]

18340.

The city council shall, prior to the adoption of the resolution of intention to order any improvement to be made, require the superintendent of streets to make and file with the clerk a written report containing the following:

(a) An estimate of the cost of such improvement and incidental expenses for the period of time recommended to be specified in the resolution of intention.

(b) A diagram or map showing the streets affected by the proceeding and in which street lighting systems have been installed and also each lot or parcel of land abutting such streets. Each lot or parcel of land shall be given a separate number upon the diagram. The diagram, as finally approved by the city council, shall govern for all details as to the lots or parcels of land benefited by the proceeding.

(c) A proposed assessment of the total amount of the probable or estimated costs and expenses of the proposed improvement upon the several lots or parcels of land shown on the diagram or map referred to in subdivision (b) above, in proportion to the estimated benefits to be received by each such lot or parcel of land, respectively, for the period of time recommended for the continuance of the improvement and which is to be set out in the resolution of intention. The assessment shall refer to such lots or parcels of land upon the diagram or map by the respective numbers thereon.

(d) Plans and specifications which shall set out, among other things, the general type of street lighting system in each zone. The lighting systems to be improved shall be divided into zones and in each zone shall be grouped those systems of approximately the same general type. It shall be a sufficient description of the location of the lights to be improved if such plans or specifications show or describe the approximate location of the lights.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18341.

Upon the filing of the report, the clerk shall present it to the city council for consideration at its next regular meeting, and that body may correct or modify it in any respect. The report as approved or as corrected or modified by the city council shall stand as the report for the purpose of all subsequent proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18342.

When the report has been approved, the city council shall adopt a resolution of intention to order the improvement to be made. The resolution shall:

(a) Briefly describe the proposed improvement.

(b) Refer to the streets, by their lawful or official names or the names by which they are commonly known.

(c) If the improvement is not upon a street and there is no lawful or common name thereof, then briefly describe the land or right of way on which the improvement is to be made.

(d) Refer to the report of the superintendent of streets on file in the office of the city clerk.

(e) Fix the period of time for which the improvement is to be made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1234, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

18343.

(a) The city council shall cause notice to be mailed and set the time and date for a public meeting and public hearing pursuant to Section 54954.6 of the Government Code.

(b) If assessments are to be levied as contemplated by Section 18340, the notice procedures shall comply with Section 53753 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 262, Sec. 44.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Protest and Hearing [18362. - 18366.]

18362.

(a) At any time not later than the hour set for hearing protests any owner of any lot or parcel of land liable to be assessed for the improvement may make written protest against the proposed improvement by filing his or her protest with the clerk. No other protests shall be considered by the city council except as provided in this chapter.

(b) If assessments are to be levied, the protest and hearing procedures shall comply with Section 53753 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 262, Sec. 45.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

18364.

If there is a majority protest by the landowners in any zone to the improvement in that zone, or if the street superintendent reports that it is practical to subdivide a zone and a majority of the landowners in that subdivided zone protest the improvement in that subdivided zone, the city council shall strike that zone or subdivided zone from the proceedings and correct the proposed assessment accordingly, unless that body, by a four-fifths affirmative vote of all its members finds that the public health and safety require that street lights in that zone or subdivided zone be improved. The determination of the city council shall be final and conclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 860, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

18365.

If a zone or subdivided zone is struck from the proceedings, the city council may proceed the same as though that zone or subdivided zone was not a part of the original proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18366.

Immediately upon the city council’s determination it shall have jurisdiction to confirm the report and assessment, and order the proposed improvement to be contracted for or supplied as provided in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Levying and Collecting the Assessment [18390. - 18405.]

18390.

The city council shall thereafter levy an assessment upon each lot and parcel of land for the first contract year for the amount estimated to be necessary to improve the street lighting system for the ensuing contract year. Prior to the expiration of each contract year the city council shall by resolution fix and levy the assessment for the amount estimated to be necessary to improve the system for such ensuing contract year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18391.

The city council may order by resolution that any part or amount of the next installment of the estimated cost and expense of any improvement be paid out of the city treasury from such fund as the city council may designate, in wihich case the liability and obligation to pay any sum so provided for shall accrue and become fixed upon the date of the levy of the installment assessment next succeeding the adoption of the resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18392.

Whenever a part of the next installment of the estimated cost and expense is to be paid by the city, the superintendent of streets, in making up the installment assessment for such cost and expense, shall first deduct from the whole estimated cost and expense that part or amount which is to be paid by the city, and shall assess the remainder of the cost and expense proportionately upon the lots or parcels of land liable to be assessed in the manner provided in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18393.

Any surplus assessments collected shall be applied by the city council to reduce the assessment to be levied either for the next ensuing contract year or for the last contract year under the proceedings, and for the latter purpose such surplus may be permitted to accumulate in the assessment fund. Such reductions shall be made as nearly as possible to the zones or subdivided zones from which such surplus assessments were collected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18394.

If there is any suplus remaining at the close of the last contract year under any proceedings, such surplus shall be used as follows:

(a) If new proceedings are started within one year after the close of the last contract year, such surplus shall be applied toward a reduction of the first installment of the new assessment. Such part of the surplus as was collected from each zone or subdivided zone shall be applied to reduce the installment levied against that zone or subdivided zone.

(b) If new proceedings are not started within the one-year period or if one or more zones or subdivided zones are omitted for any reason from the new proceedings any such surplus shall become and remain a part of the general funds of the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18395.

Whenever a lot or parcel of land belonging to the United States or to the state, or to a county, city, public agent, mandatory of the government, school board, educational, penal or reform institution, or facility for the housing of persons with developmental or intellectual disabilities or mental health disorders and being in use in the performance of a public function abuts the public streets in which street lighting systems are located and are to be improved under the proceedings, the city council may, by resolution adopted prior to the levy of an installment assessment, declare that the lots or parcels of land or any of them shall be omitted from the installment assessments thereafter to be levied to cover the costs and expenses of the improvement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 54.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

18396.

If the lots or parcels of land, or any of them, are so omitted from any installment assessment then the total cost and expense of the improvement shall be assessed on the remaining lots or parcels of land lying within such zones or subdivisions of zones as the city shall direct in the resolution, without regard to such omitted lots or parcels of land.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18397.

If in such resolution the city council declares that the lots or parcels of land owned as provided in Section 18395 shall be included in an installment assessment or if no declaration is made respecting such lots or parcels of land, or any of them, the city shall be liable for such sums as may thereafter be assessed against such lots or parcels of land, which sums shall be payable by the city out of the general fund unless the city council shall in the resolution designate another fund.

Any such sums which may be assessed against any such lots or parcels of land shall not be payable by the city when such sums are paid by the owner of or the governing body controlling such lots or parcels of land.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18398.

The validity of any assessment levied under this part shall not be contested in any action or proceeding unless such action or proceeding is commenced within 30 days after the city council has acquired jurisdiction to confirm the report and assessment and any appeal from a final judgment in such an action or proceeding shall be perfected within 30 days after the entry of such judgment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18399.

Upon the levying of an installment assessment the city clerk shall transmit the diagram and assessment and any modifications or corrections thereof made by the city council to the tax collector.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18400.

Upon the receipt of the diagram and installment assessment the tax collector shall record them in a suitable book to be kept for that purpose and append thereto his certificate of the date of such recording. Such record shall become a part of the assessment roll upon which other taxes of the city are entered and shall be collected at the same time, in the same manner and by the same officer as in the case of other city taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18401.

Where the duties of assessing property and collecting city taxes are performed for the city by the county assessor and the county tax collector, in the manner provided by law, a certified copy of the diagram and assessment shall be filed with the county auditor on or before the tenth day of August. In each such diagram and assessment so filed with the county auditor, the descriptions of the properties reported shall be the descriptions used for the same properties on the map books of the county assessor for the then current year. The county auditor shall enter the amounts of the respective assessments on the county tax roll opposite the respective parcels of land and thereafter the amounts shall be collected at the same time and in the same manner as county taxes are collected and all laws applicable to the levy, collection and enforcement of county taxes shall be and are hereby made applicable to such special assessment taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18402.

All sums collected on account of such assessment shall be placed in the city treasury to the credit of a special fund, which shall be designated by the name of the proceeding. The special fund shall be used only for paying the costs and expenses of the improvement described in the resolution ordering the work, including the cost of all posting and publication provided for in this part and any other incidental expenses connected with the proceeding. The city council may at any time advance to such special fund out of any available funds in the city treasury, sums in excess of the amount to be paid by the city toward the cost of such improvement and may reimburse the city for such advances by repaying the amount thereof out of any money that thereafter comes into such special fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18403.

When the diagram and installment assessment are recorded, the several amounts assessed shall be a lien upon the lots or parcels of land assessed, respectively. Such lien shall continue and be enforced in the same manner and with the same penalties as other taxes of the city are continued and enforced.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18404.

Where the duties of assessing property and collecting city taxes are performed for a city by the county assessor and the county tax collector in a manner provided by law, cities and counties may enter into an agreement whereby special assessments may be collected at the same time and in the same manner as county taxes are collected and all laws applicable to the levy, collection and enforcement of county taxes shall be and are hereby made applicable to such special assessments. The amount of the compensation to be paid a county for the collection of such assessments shall be provided for in the agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1101.)
-------------------------------------------

18405.

The lien shall be subordinate to all fixed special assessment liens previously imposed upon the same property, but it shall have priority over all fixed special assessment liens which may thereafter be created against the property. A supplemental assessment is a new assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1465.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. City Furnishing Maintenance and Service [18440. - 18440.]

18440.

If the city owns or operates or owns and operates a public utility capable of furnishing the improvement provided for in this part, this section may be used as an alternative procedure to that provided in Chapter 6 of this part. The city council by resolution may direct the superintendent of streets, instead of calling for bids and entering into a contract, to issue an interdepartmental purchase order for the improvement of the street lighting system upon such terms as may be agreed upon between the street superintendent and the public utility board or commission. Such purchase order shall not be effective until it is approved by the city council. The interdepartmental purchase order shall state the date on which the improvement shall be started and that it shall continue in force for a period of one year from the effective date thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. THE MUNICIPAL LIGHTING MAINTENANCE DISTRICT ACT OF 1927 [18600. - 18781.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [18600. - 18609.]

18600.

This part may be cited as the Municipal Lighting Maintenance District Act of 1927.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18601.

This part shall be liberally construed in order to effectuate its purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18602.

This part provides an alternative system for the maintenance and operation of a street lighting system within cities, and the provisions of this part shall not apply to nor affect any other provisions of this code. When any proceedings are commenced under this part, the provisions of this part and no others shall apply to all such proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18603.

Unless the particular provision or the context otherwise requires, the definitions and general provisions contained in this chapter shall govern the construction of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18604.

“City” includes all corporations organized and existing for municipal purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18605.

“Street lighting system” or “system” includes any or all appliances, poles, posts, pipes, conduits, lamps and other necessary works or appliances used for street lighting purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18606.

“Maintaining and operating” or any of its variants, when used with relation to a street lighting system, includes the cost of necessary repairs, replacements, fuel, power and all other items necessary for the proper maintenance and operation of a street lighting system, or the expense of any one or more of those items.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18607.

“City council” includes any body which by law is the legislative department of the government of the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18608.

“Clerk” or “city clerk” means any person or officer who is or acts as clerk of the city council.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18609.

“Public way” includes all public highways, roads, streets, avenues, boulevards, alleys, parkways and other rights of way of the public, or any portion thereof, within a city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Authority to Create the District [18630. - 18633.]

18630.

Whenever the public interest or convenience may require, the city council of any city in which a street lighting system has been installed may order that the expenses of maintaining and operating the system be assessed, either partly or wholly, upon lands in the city lying within a district which will be benefited by such maintenance and operation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18631.

The lands which will be benefited by, and which are to be assessed for, the maintenance and operation of the system shall form and be known as a lighting maintenance district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18632.

Any number of public ways and one or more street lighting systems may be included in one district, but the district, the public ways and the street lighting systems must lie entirely within the city whose city council forms the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18633.

Before forming any district or ordering any part of the expenses of the maintenance and operation of any street lighting system to be assessed upon the lands within a district formed under the provisions of this part, the city council shall adopt a resolution of intention so to do.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Preliminary Report and Resolution of Intention [18660. - 18666.]

18660.

Before adopting a resolution of intention, the city council shall order the city engineer to prepare and file with it a report containing substantially the following matters:

(a) A statement of the public ways or portions thereof to be lighted.

(b) A general description of the lighting systems to be maintained and operated.

(c) A statement of the general items of maintenance and operation proposed to be furnished the systems. Such items may include electric power, gas, repairs, replacements, and any other items necessary for the proper maintenance and operation of the systems.

(d) A statement of the estimated cost of maintenance and operation for the first year and an estimate of the amount of electric power necessary for the operation of the system each year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18661.

The city council shall order the engineer to prepare and file with the report a map or plat of the district to be benefited by the maintenance and operation and which is to be assessed to pay the expenses thereof. The map or plat shall also show the public ways to be lighted under the proceedings and the approximate location of the lights to be maintained and operated thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18662.

The report and map shall be presented to the city council and examined by it and either the report or map, or both, may be modified by the city council at any time prior to the adoption of the resolution of intention. When the report and map are finally approved by the city council, they shall be filed with the clerk.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18663.

The resolution of intention shall contain:

(a) A statement of the public ways to be lighted.

(b) A general description of the lighting systems to be maintained and operated.

(c) A statement of the general items of expense of maintenance and operation proposed to be furnished for the street lighting systems, the cost of which is to be assessed in whole or in part against the lands within the district. Those items may include electric power, gas, repairs, replacements, and any other items necessary for the proper maintenance of the street lighting systems.

(d) A statement of the estimated cost of all other items of maintenance and operation to be furnished the systems in the district for the first year; in addition, a separate estimate of the amount of gas or electric power necessary for the systems each year.

(e) A general description of the boundaries of the district to be benefited by and to be assessed to pay the costs of the maintenance and operation.

(f) A statement of the length of time, which shall not exceed five years from the date of the formation of the district, that the maintenance and operation shall be furnished for the systems.

(g) Notice of a public meeting and public hearing shall be given pursuant to Section 54954.6 of the Government Code. All persons having any interest in lands within the district liable to be assessed for the expenses of the maintenance and operation may be heard at the public meeting and the public hearing and any of these persons may present any objections that they may have by written protest filed with the clerk at or before the time set for the hearing.

(h) If assessments are to be levied, the notice, protest, and hearing procedures shall comply with Section 53753 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 262, Sec. 47.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

18664.

The city council may order in the resolution of intention that a certain percentage of the costs of such maintenance and operation shall be paid out of the treasury of the city from such fund as the city council may designate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18665.

The resolution shall refer to the map or plat on file with the clerk for the boundaries of the district to be assessed, the public ways to be lighted and the approximate location of the lights thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18666.

After the passage of the resolution of intention, the clerk shall publish it by at least two insertions in a daily or weekly newspaper of general circulation designated by the city council for that purpose. Copies of the resolution headed “Notice of formation of lighting maintenance district” in letters not less than one inch in height, and signed by the clerk shall be posted by the superintendent of streets not more than 300 feet apart, and not less than three in all, along all open streets within the district. The first posting of notice and the first publication of the resolution of intention shall each be at least 20 days before the date set for the hearing of protests.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Protest and Hearing [18690. - 18692.]

18690.

At the time and place fixed for the hearing of protests or at any time to which the hearing is adjourned, the city council shall hear the evidence introduced in support of the protests. At the hearing the city council may modify the provisions for the maintenance and operation as stated in the resolution of intention by omitting one or more of the items stated therein, and may modify the boundaries of the district, but any land not within the district as described in the resolution of intention may not be included therein. The city council may change the percentage of the total maintenance and operation cost to be paid by the city and by the district; but the percentage to be paid by the district shall not be increased without further notice being given and a hearing being held in the same manner as notice was given and a hearing held on the original resolution of intention.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18691.
